District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Office of District Waterways Management Establishment Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Office of District Waterways Management Establishment Act of 2022,
effective March 22, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-336; D.C. Official Code § 8-191.01 et seq.), is amended
as follows:
(a) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 8-191.02) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b)(1)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “section 2(e) of the
Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-141; D.C. Official Code § 1-
523.01(e)),” and inserting the phrase “section 2(f) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective
March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-141; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(f)),” in its place.
(2) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” inserting a
semicolon in its place.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(B) Paragraph (10) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
(C) A new paragraph (11) is added to read as follows:
“(11) The Department of Parks and Recreation.”.
(3) Subsection (f) is amended by striking the phrase “once every month” and
inserting the phrase “once every 2 months” in its place.
(b) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 8-191.03) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language of subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “one year” and insert the phrase “2 years” in its
place.
(B) Strike the phrase “develop and adopt” and insert the word “develop”
in its place.
(2) Subsection (b)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “At least 60 days prior to
adoption of an Advisory Plan, the” and inserting the word “The” in its place.
(3) Subsections (c) and (d) are amended to read as follows:
“(c) After conclusion of the public comment period, and within 60 days after completing
revisions, if any, the voting members of the Commission shall adopt the Advisory Plan.
Thereupon, the Advisory Plan shall be submitted to the Office of Waterways Management for
publication.
“(d) If considered necessary by the Commission, the Advisory Plan shall be updated at
least once every 3 years, following the same process required for the initial Advisory Plan
pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section.”.
Sec. 3. Section 2(f) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law
2-141; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(f)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (72) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (73) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in
its place.
(c) A new paragraph (74) is added to read as follows:
“(74) The Office of District Waterways Management, established by section 2(a)
of the Office of District Waterways Management Establishment Act of 2022, effective March 22,
2023 (D.C. Law 24-336; D.C. Official Code § 8-191.01(a)); and”.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of October 18, 2025.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3